New Jersey, session 222, S1169.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  The Department of Education shall annually collect data from school districts, educational services commissions, and approved private schools for students with disabilities on the number and times a physical restraint or a seclusion technique was utilized on a student with disabilities and the type and duration of the physical restraint or seclusion technique that was utilized, and the number of students with disabilities on which a physical restraint or a seclusion technique was utilized. The department shall publish the data collected pursuant to this section annually on its website in a manner that protects student privacy.  The data published on the website shall be disaggregated by county and by the race, gender, and age of the student. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.